Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-27,102
Income tax; collection; unpaid tax; notice.

(1) The income tax imposed by the Nebraska Revenue Act of 1967 shall be collected by the Tax Commissioner and he may establish the mode or time for the collection of any amount due under the provisions of such act if not otherwise specified. The Tax Commissioner shall, upon request, give a receipt for any income tax collected under such act. The Tax Commissioner may authorize incorporated banks or trust companies which are depositaries or fiscal agents of this state to receive and give a receipt for any income tax imposed under the provisions of such act, in such manner, at such times, and under such conditions as he may prescribe; and the Tax Commissioner shall prescribe the manner, times, and conditions under which the receipt of tax by such banks and trust companies is to be treated as payment of tax to the Tax Commissioner.

(2) The Tax Commissioner shall as soon as practicable give notice to each person liable for any amount of tax, addition to tax, additional amount, penalty or interest, which has been assessed but remains unpaid, stating the amount and demanding payment thereof within sixty days of the date of the notice. Such notice shall be left at the dwelling place or usual place of business of such person or shall be sent by mail to such person's last-known address.

Laws 1967, c. 487, § 102, p. 1618.